Utah statutes.
26-8a-250.   Establishment of statewide trauma system.

The department shall establish and actively supervise a statewide trauma system to:

(1)  promote optimal care for trauma patients;

(2)  alleviate unnecessary death and disability from trauma and emergency illness;

(3)  inform health care providers about trauma system capabilities;

(4)  encourage the efficient and effective continuum of patient care, including prevention, prehospital care, hospital care, and rehabilitative care; and

(5)  minimize the overall cost of trauma care.



Enacted by Chapter 305, 2000 General Session

